Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 2. Organization

§ 17-19-201.
Incorporators.

One (1) or more persons may act as the incorporator or incorporators of a corporation by delivering articles of incorporation to the secretary of state for filing.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-202.
Articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation shall set forth:

A corporate name for the corporation that satisfies the requirements of W.S.

17-19-401

;

One (1) of the following statements:

This corporation is a public benefit corporation;

This corporation is a mutual benefit corporation;

This corporation is a religious corporation.

The street address of the corporation’s initial registered office and the name of its initial registered agent at that office;

The name and address of each incorporator;

Whether or not the corporation will have members; and

Provisions not inconsistent with law regarding the distribution of assets on dissolution. These provisions may be consistent with the requirements of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, for tax exempt status.

The articles of incorporation may set forth:

Any provision required by the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, for tax exempt or other tax status;

The purpose or purposes for which the corporation is organized, which may be, either alone or in combination with other purposes, the transaction of any lawful activity;

The names and addresses of the individuals who are to serve as the initial directors;

Provisions not inconsistent with law regarding:

Managing and regulating the affairs of the corporation;

Defining, limiting and regulating the powers of the corporation, its board of directors and members (or any class of members); and

The characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations and obligations attaching to each or any class of members.

Any provision that under this act is required or permitted to be set forth in the bylaws;

Any provision giving members different numbers of votes on all questions or particular classes of questions, unequal assessments, or in the case of mutual benefit corporations, unequal rights to assets upon dissolution. These provisions may include the basis upon which these inequalities are to be determined. For mutual benefit corporations, the provisions may include rights of dissent if these rights or inequalities are changed.

Each incorporator and director named in the articles shall sign the articles.

The articles of incorporation need not set forth any of the corporate powers enumerated in this act.

The articles of incorporation shall be accompanied by a written consent to appointment manually signed by the registered agent.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Internal Revenue Code. —

The federal Internal Revenue Code, referred to in the second sentence in subsection (a)(vi) and in subsection (b)(i), appears as 26 U.S.C.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (b)(v) and (d), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxviii).

§ 17-19-203.
Incorporation.

Unless a delayed effective date is specified, the corporate existence begins when the articles of incorporation are filed.

The secretary of state’s filing of the articles of incorporation is conclusive proof that the incorporators satisfied all conditions precedent to incorporation except in a proceeding by the state to cancel or revoke the incorporation or involuntarily dissolve the corporation.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-204.
Liability for preincorporation transactions.

All persons purporting to act as or on behalf of a corporation formed under this act, knowing there was no incorporation under this act, are jointly and severally liable for all liabilities created while so acting.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in this section, see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxviii).

Law reviews. —

For comments, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

§ 17-19-205.
Organization of corporation.

After incorporation:

If initial directors are named in the articles of incorporation, the initial directors shall hold an organizational meeting, at the call of a majority of the directors, to complete the organization of the corporation by appointing officers, adopting bylaws and carrying on any other business brought before the meeting;

If initial directors are not named in the articles, the incorporator or incorporators shall hold an organizational meeting at the call of a majority of the incorporators:

To elect directors and complete the organization of the corporation; or

To elect a board of directors who shall complete the organization of the corporation.

Action required or permitted by this act to be taken by incorporators at an organizational meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action taken is evidenced by one (1) or more written consents describing the action taken and signed either manually or in facsimile by each incorporator.

An organizational meeting may be held in or out of this state.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (b), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxviii).

§ 17-19-206.
Bylaws.

The incorporators or board of directors of a corporation shall adopt initial bylaws for the corporation.

The bylaws may contain any provision for regulating and managing the affairs of the corporation that is not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation.

If bylaws are not adopted:

An annual meeting shall be held within three (3) months after the close of the corporation’s fiscal year;

The required officers shall be the president, the secretary and the treasurer; and

Bylaws may be adopted at any director or member meeting.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-207.
Emergency bylaws and powers.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, the board of directors of a corporation may adopt bylaws to be effective only in an emergency defined in subsection (d) of this section. The emergency bylaws, which are subject to amendment or repeal by the members, may make all provisions necessary for managing the corporation during the emergency, including:

Procedures for calling a meeting of the board of directors;

Quorum requirements for the meeting; and

Designation of additional or substitute directors.

All provisions of the regular bylaws consistent with the emergency bylaws remain effective during the emergency. The emergency bylaws are not effective after the emergency ends.

Corporate action taken in good faith in accordance with the emergency bylaws:

Binds the corporation; and

Shall not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee or agent unless the action violates standards otherwise set forth in this act.

An emergency exists for purposes of this section if a quorum of the corporation’s directors cannot readily be assembled because of some extraordinary event.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to other emergency powers, see §

17-19-303

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (c)(ii), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxviii).